North Dakota statutes. TITLE 16.1 Elections
CHAPTER 16.1-01 General Provisions

16.1-01-00.1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this title, unless the context otherwise requires, “candidate” means:

An individual holding public office;

An individual who publicly has declared that individual’s candidacy for nomination for election or election to public office or has filed or accepted a nomination for public office;

An individual who has formed a campaign or other committee for that individual’s candidacy for public office;

An individual who has circulated a nominating petition to have that individual’s name placed on the ballot; and

An individual who, in any manner, has solicited or received a contribution for that individual’s candidacy for public office, whether before or after the election for that office.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 164, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-01-01.
Secretary of state to supervise election procedures — County administrator of elections.

The secretary of state is, ex officio, supervisor of elections and may employ additional personnel to administer this title. The secretary of state shall supervise the conduct of elections and in that supervisory capacity has, in addition to other powers conferred by law, the power to examine upon the secretary of state’s request or the request of any election official, any election ballot or other material, voting system authorized by chapter 16.1-06, or device used in connection with any election, for the purpose of determining sufficient compliance with the law and established criteria and standards adopted by the secretary of state according to section 16.1-06-26. The secretary of state, upon determining any ballot or other material, voting system, or device is not in sufficient compliance with the law or established criteria and standards, shall direct the proper changes to be made, and in the case of voting systems, may decertify the voting systems according to the rules adopted under section 16.1-06-26.

In addition to other duties provided elsewhere by law, the secretary of state shall:

Develop and implement uniform training programs for all election officials in the state.

Prepare information for voters on voting procedures.

Publish and distribute an election calendar, a manual on election procedures, and a map of all legislative districts.

Convene a state election conference of county auditors at the beginning of each election year and whenever deemed necessary by the secretary of state to discuss uniform implementation of state election policies.

Prescribe the form of all ballots and the form and wording of ballots on state referendum questions, issues, and constitutional amendments.

Investigate or cause to be investigated the nonperformance of duties or violations of election laws by election officers.

Require such reports from county auditors on election matters as deemed necessary.

Certify results of statewide elections.

Prepare and publish reports whenever deemed necessary on the conduct and costs of voting in the state, including a tabulation of election returns and such other information and statistics as deemed appropriate.

Establish standards for voting precincts and polling places, numbering precincts, precinct maps, maintaining and updating pollbooks, and forms and supplies, including but not limited to, ballots, pollbooks, and reports.

Prescribe the order in which each political subdivision will appear on an election ballot.

Develop and conduct a test election for the state’s voting system prior to each statewide election utilizing the votes cast within each county according to the logic and accuracy testing required in section 16.1-06-15.

In carrying out the secretary of state’s duties and to assure uniform voting opportunities throughout the state, and for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this title and any other requirement imposed upon the state by the Help America Vote Act of 2002 [Pub. L. 107-252; 116 Stat. 1666; 42 U.S.C. 15301 et seq.] not otherwise addressed in this Act, the secretary of state may from time to time issue rules the secretary of state deems necessary, which must be consistent with the provisions of this title or the Help America Vote Act of 2002 and be adopted and published in accordance with chapter 28-32, but which need not comply with section 28-32-07.

In each county there must be a county administrator of elections who must be the county auditor. The county auditor is responsible to the secretary of state for the proper administration within the auditor’s county of state laws, rules, and regulations concerning election procedures.

In addition to other statutory duties, the county auditor shall:

Procure and distribute supplies required for voting in the county.

Prepare and disseminate voter information as prescribed by the secretary of state.

Fully comply with the test election required of this section.

Carry out uniform training programs for all county and precinct election officials as prescribed by the secretary of state.

Provide completed reports on election matters as required by the secretary of state.

Attend, or send a designee to attend, state election conferences convened by the secretary of state.

Comply with the form of the ballot as prescribed by state law and the secretary of state.

Comply with the standards for voting precincts and polling locations, numbering precincts, precinct maps, maintaining and updating pollbooks, and forms and supplies, including ballots, pollbooks, and reports as established by the secretary of state.

Assist with investigations initiated by the secretary of state under this section.

Receive and handle complaints referred to the county auditor by any voter or precinct official involving circulation of petitions, challenges to voters, actions of election officials, or irregularities of any kind in voting. The county auditor shall refer complaints to the secretary of state or the proper prosecuting authority, as the county auditor deems appropriate.

Upon completion of the duties required by this subsection, the county auditor shall certify to the secretary of state, in the manner prescribed by the secretary of state, that the duties have been completed. A knowing violation of this subsection is an offense under section 12.1-11-06.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 271, § 1; 1991, ch. 442, § 1; 2003, ch. 171, § 1; 2011, ch. 152, § 3; 2017, ch. 154, §§
2, 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 164, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Elections: validity of state or local legislative ban on write-in votes, 69 A.L.R.4th 948.

Preemption of State Election Laws By Help America Vote Act. 47 A.L.R. Fed 2d 81.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota’s New Election Code, 57 N.D. L. Rev. 427 (1981).

16.1-01-02.
Applicability of provisions of title.

The provisions of this title govern all primary, general, and special statewide and legislative elections, and all other elections, unless otherwise provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1.

Cross-References.

Election offenses, see N.D.C.C. §§ 12.1-14-02, 12.1-14-03, 16.1-01-12.

Municipal elections, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-21.

Township elections, see N.D.C.C. ch. 58-04.

16.1-01-02.1.
State policy encouraging employers to establish policy granting employees time to vote.

It is the policy of this state to encourage voting by all eligible voters at all statewide special, primary, or general elections. To this end, employers are encouraged to establish a program to grant an employee who is a qualified voter to be absent from the employee’s employment for the purpose of voting when an employee’s regular work schedule conflicts with voting during time when polls are open.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 236, § 1.

16.1-01-02.2.
Special election — Special procedures.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governor may call a special election to be held in ninety days after the call if a special session of the legislative assembly has been held, any of the ninety-day period for the submission of a referendum petition to the secretary of state with respect to any measure enacted during the special session occurs during a regular legislative session, and a referendum petition has been submitted to refer a measure or part of a measure enacted during the special session. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governor may call a special election to be held in ninety days after the call if a referendum petition has been submitted to refer a measure or part of a measure that establishes a legislative redistricting plan.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 245, § 1; ch. 246, § 1; 1991 Sp., ch. 883, § 1; 2007, ch. 186, § 1.

16.1-01-02.3.
Special election costs — Reimbursement.

The state shall reimburse each county for the costs incurred by the county for conducting a statewide special election that is not held on the date of a statewide primary or general election. Each county shall submit a detailed statement to the office of the budget which lists all expenses incurred by the county in conducting the special election within forty-five days after the special election. The office of the budget shall submit a request for an appropriation to reimburse the counties to the next regular or special session of the legislative assembly. The legislative assembly shall appropriate the funds necessary for the payment of the special election costs.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 208, § 1.

16.1-01-03.
Opening and closing of the polls.

The polls at all primary, general, and special elections must be opened at nine a.m. or earlier, but not earlier than seven a.m., as designated for any precinct by resolution of the governing body of the city or county in which the precinct is located. The polls must remain open continuously until seven p.m. or a later hour, not later than nine p.m., as may be designated for a precinct by resolution of the governing body of the city or county in which the precinct is located. All electors standing in line to vote at the time the polls are set to close must be allowed to vote, but electors arriving after closing time may not be allowed to vote. A voter may take up to thirty minutes to mark and cast the ballot after receiving the ballot from the election judge. After the polls close, the election board shall generate the report of the vote totals not later than thirty minutes after the last elector in line at the closing time received a ballot. An elector remaining in the polling place after the thirty minutes have expired who has not completed marking the ballot must be offered the choice of casting the ballot as marked or continuing to mark the ballot. If the elector chooses to continue marking the ballot, the ballot selections must be excluded from the report of the vote totals generated by the election board but must be forwarded by the election board to the canvassing board and added to the final tally. The secretary of state shall develop uniform, mandatory procedures for election boards to ensure the secrecy of each elector’s ballot. The election officers present are responsible for determining who arrived in time to vote, and the election officers shall establish appropriate procedures for making that determination. All determinations required to be made pursuant to this section relating to polling hours must be made, and the county auditor notified of the determinations, no later than thirty days before an election.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 2019, ch. 171, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 164, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Municipal polls, see

N.D.C.C. § 40-21-02.

16.1-01-04.
Qualifications of electors — Voting requirements.

To qualify as an elector of this state, an individual must be:

A citizen of the United States;

Eighteen years or older; and

A resident of this state who has resided in the precinct at least thirty days immediately preceding any election.

Pursuant to section 2 of article II of the Constitution of North Dakota, voting by individuals convicted and sentenced for a felony must be limited according to chapter 12.1-33.

A qualified elector may not authorize an attorney in fact, guardian, or other individual to apply for any ballot or to vote in any election on behalf of or in the place of the qualified elector.

An elector seeking to vote in an election must meet the identification requirements specified in section 16.1-01-04.1.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 1993, ch. 207, § 1; 2003, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 186, § 2; 2009, ch. 180, § 2; 2015, ch. 157, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 152, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 157, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Qualification of electors, see N.D. Const., art. II, §§ 1, 2.

Qualification of electors in municipal election, see N.D.C.C. § 40-21-01.

Township election, qualified voters, see N.D.C.C. § 58-04-08.

Unqualified voting, penalty, see N.D.C.C. § 16.1-01-12.

16.1-01-04.1.
Identification verifying eligibility as an elector.

A qualified elector shall provide a valid form of identification to the proper election official before receiving a ballot for voting.

The identification must provide the following information regarding the elector:

Legal name;

Current residential street address in North Dakota; and

Date of birth.

A valid form of identification is:

A driver’s license or nondriver’s identification card issued by the North Dakota department of transportation; or

An official form of identification issued by a tribal government to a tribal member residing in this state.

If an individual’s valid form of identification does not include all the information required under subsection 2 or the information on the identification is not current, the identification must be supplemented by presenting any of the following issued to the individual which provides the missing or outdated information:

A current utility bill;

A current bank statement;

A check issued by a federal, state, or local government;

A paycheck;

A document issued by a federal, state, or local government; or

A printed document containing all of the information required by subsection 2 issued by an institution of higher education for an enrolled student residing in the state and containing the institution’s letterhead or seal, along with a student photo identification card issued by the institution and containing the student’s photograph and legal name.

The following forms of identification are valid for the specified individuals living under special circumstances who do not possess a valid form of identification under subsection 3.

For an individual living in a long-term care facility, a long-term care certificate prescribed by the secretary of state and issued by a long-term care facility in this state;

For a uniformed service member or immediate family member temporarily stationed away from the individual’s residence in this state, or a resident of the state temporarily living outside the country, a current military identification card or passport; and

For an individual living with a disability that prevents the individual from traveling away from the individual’s home, the signature on an absentee or mail ballot application from another qualified elector who, by signing, certifies the applicant is a qualified elector.

If an individual is not able to show a valid form of identification but asserts qualifications as an elector in the precinct in which the individual desires to vote, the individual may mark a ballot that must be securely set aside in a sealed envelope designed by the secretary of state. After the ballot is set aside, the individual may show a valid form of identification to either a polling place election board member if the individual returns to the polling place before the polls close, or to an employee of the office of the election official responsible for the administration of the election before the meeting of the canvassing board occurring on the thirteenth day after the election. Each ballot set aside under this subsection must be presented to the members of the canvassing board for proper inclusion or exclusion from the tally.

The secretary of state shall develop uniform procedures for the requirements of subsection 5 which must be followed by the election official responsible for the administration of the election.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 152, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 164, § 6, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 165, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 16.1-01-04.1 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 164, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1253; and Section 2 of Chapter 165, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1447.

16.1-01-04.2.
Residence for voting — Rules for determining.

For purposes of voting:

Every qualified elector may have only one residence, shown by an actual fixed permanent dwelling, establishment, or any other abode to which the individual returns when not called elsewhere for labor or other special or temporary purposes.

The street address verified by the individual as provided in section16.1-01-04.1 when requesting a ballot to vote must be the address of residence for the individual.

An individual retains a residence in this state until another has been gained.

The acts of residing at a new address for thirty days and verifying that address as provided under section16.1-01-04.1 constitute a change in the individual’s voting residence.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 152, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

16.1-01-05.
Voting by qualified elector moving from one precinct to another.

If a qualified elector moves from one precinct to another precinct within this state, the elector is entitled to vote in the precinct from which the elector moved until the elector has established a new residence pursuant to section 16.1-01-04.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 1999, ch. 200, § 1.

Cross-References.

Removal of voter from one precinct to another, see N.D. Const., Art. II, § 1.

16.1-01-05.1.
Voter lists — Addition or transfer of names.

Through the use of the central voter file provided for in chapter 16.1-02, the secretary of state shall establish a procedure by which a county auditor may transfer an individual’s name from the voter list of one precinct to the voter list of another precinct in the state if the individual establishes a new residence, and by which an individual who establishes residence in the state may have the individual’s name placed on the voter list in the appropriate precinct. The procedure provided for in this section may not be used to require the registration of electors.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 209, § 1; 2007, ch. 186, § 3; 2021, ch. 164, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Validity of Statute Providing for Purging Voter Registration Lists of Inactive Voters. 51 A.L.R.6th 287.

16.1-01-06.
Highest number of votes elects.

Unless otherwise expressly provided by the laws of this state, in all elections for the choice of any officer, the individual receiving the highest number of votes for any office is deemed elected to that office.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 2021, ch. 164, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Municipal election, highest number of votes elects, see N.D.C.C. § 40-21-17.

Newspaper receiving highest number of votes elected official newspaper, see N.D.C.C. § 46-06-06.

16.1-01-07.
Constitutional amendments and other questions to be advertised — Notification by secretary of state — Manner of publishing.

If a proposed constitutional amendment or other question is to be submitted to the people of the state for popular vote, the secretary of state shall certify the amendment or other question to each county auditor not less than fifty-five days before the election, and each auditor shall cause notice of the question to be included in the notice required by section 16.1-13-05. Questions to be submitted to the people of a particular county must be advertised in the same manner.

At the same time the secretary of state certifies notice to the county auditors of the submission of a constitutional amendment or other question, the secretary of state shall certify the ballot form for the questions. The ballot form must conform to the provisions of section 16.1-06-09 and must be used by all county auditors to prepare ballots for submission to the electorate of each county and to prepare sample ballots. The publication of either the paper ballot or the ballot as it will appear to individuals using a voting system device, whichever corresponds to the method of voting used in the area involved, will satisfy any requirement in this title for a sample ballot to be published. For two consecutive weeks before the sample ballot is published, an analysis of any constitutional amendment, initiated measure, or referred measure, written by the secretary of state after consultation with the attorney general, must be published in columns to enable the electors to become familiar with the effect of the proposed constitutional amendment or initiated or referred measure.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 1981, ch. 242, § 4; 1987, ch. 242, § 2; 1995, ch. 206, § 1; 1997, ch. 187, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 34; 2003, ch. 171, § 2; 2021, ch. 164, § 9, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Amendment of constitution, see N.D. Const., art. IV, § 16.

16.1-01-08.
Correcting errors on ballots — Requiring performance of duty — Correcting or prosecuting wrongful performance.

The secretary of state shall investigate thoroughly, when the matter comes to the secretary of state’s attention, any of the following:

Any error or omission that has occurred or is about to occur in placing any name on an official election ballot; however a factual dispute regarding a candidate’s residency may be resolved only by a court order.

Any error that has been or is about to be committed in printing the ballot.

Any wrongful act that has been or is about to be done by any judge or election clerk, county auditor, canvassing board, a canvassing board member, or any other individual charged with any duty concerning the election.

Any neglect of duty which has occurred or is about to occur.

If required, the secretary of state shall order the officer or individual charged with the error, wrong, or neglect to correct the error, desist from the wrongful act, or perform any required duty. The secretary of state may call upon any county auditor for aid in investigating and correcting the problem. The secretary of state shall cause any individual who violates the secretary of state’s order to be prosecuted, if the violation constitutes an offense pursuant to this chapter. If the administrative remedies fail to correct the problem, or if the secretary of state refuses to act, any individual may petition the supreme court, or the district court of the relevant county if the election of a county officer is involved, for an order compelling the correction of the error, wrong, neglect, or act.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 2021, ch. 164, § 10, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-01-09.
Initiative or referendum petitions — Signature — Form — Circulation.

A request of the secretary of state for approval of a petition to initiate or refer a measure may be presented over the signatures of the sponsoring committee on individual signature forms that have been notarized. The secretary of state shall prepare a signature form that includes provisions for identification of the measure; the printed name, signature, and address of the committee member; and notarization of the signature. The filed signature forms must be originals.

Upon receipt of a petition to initiate or refer a measure, the secretary of state shall draft a short and concise statement that fairly represents the measure. The statement must be submitted to the attorney general for approval or disapproval. An approved statement must be affixed to the petition before it is circulated for signatures, must be called the “petition title”, and must be placed immediately before the full text of the measure.

The secretary of state and the attorney general shall complete their review of a petition in not less than five, nor more than seven, business days, excluding Saturdays.

An individual may not sign any initiative or referendum petition circulated pursuant to article III of the Constitution of North Dakota unless the individual is a qualified elector. An individual may not sign any petition more than once, and each signer shall also legibly print the signer’s name, complete residential address or rural route or general delivery address, and the date of signing on the petition. Every qualified elector signing a petition shall do so in the presence of the individual circulating the petition. A referendum or initiative petition must be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state containing the following information:

Each copy of any petition provided for in this section, before being filed, must have attached an affidavit executed by the circulator in substantially the following form:

No petition may be circulated under the authority of article III of the Constitution of North Dakota by an individual who is less than eighteen years of age, nor may the affidavit called for by subsection 3 be executed by an individual who is less than eighteen years of age at the time of signing. All petitions circulated under the authority of the constitution and of this section must be circulated in their entirety. A petition may not include a statement of intent or similar explanatory information.

When signed petitions are delivered to the secretary of state, the chairperson of the sponsoring committee shall submit to the secretary of state an affidavit stating that to the best of that individual’s knowledge, the petitions contain at least the required number of signatures. The chairperson also shall submit a complete list of petition circulators which must include each circulator’s full name and residential address. The residential address must be in this state and identify the circulator’s street address, city, and zip code. Upon submission of the petitions to the secretary of state, the petitions are considered filed and may not be returned to the sponsoring committee for the purpose of continuing the circulation process or resubmitting the petitions at a later time. An elector’s name may not be removed by the elector from a petition that has been submitted to and received by the secretary of state.

An initiative or referendum petition may be submitted to the secretary of state until midnight of the day designated as the deadline for submitting the petition.

An initiative petition may be circulated for one year from the date it is approved for circulation by the secretary of state.

REFERENDUM [INITIATIVE] PETITION TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE, STATE OF NORTH DAKOTA We, the undersigned, being qualified electors request [House (Senate) Bill passed by the Legislative Assembly] [the following initiated law] be placed on the ballot as provided by law. SPONSORING COMMITTEE The following are the names and addresses of the qualified electors of the state of North Dakota who, as the sponsoring committee for the petitioners, represent and act for the petitioners in accordance with law: Name Address (Chairperson) PETITION TITLE (To be drafted by the secretary of state, approved by the attorney general, and attached to the petition before circulation.) FULL TEXT OF THE MEASURE IF MATERIAL IS UNDERSCORED, IT IS NEW MATERIAL WHICH IS BEING ADDED. IF MATERIAL IS OVERSTRUCK BY DASHES, THE MATERIAL IS BEING DELETED. IF MATERIAL IS NOT UNDERSCORED OR OVERSTRUCK, THE MATERIAL IS EXISTING LAW THAT IS NOT BEING CHANGED. [The full text of the measure must be inserted here.] INSTRUCTIONS TO PETITION SIGNERS You are being asked to sign a petition. You must be a qualified elector. This means you are eighteen years old, you have lived in North Dakota thirty days, and you are a United States citizen. All signers shall also legibly print their name, complete residential address or rural route or general delivery address, and the date of signing on the petition. Every qualified elector signing a petition must do so in the presence of the individual circulating the petition. QUALIFIED ELECTORS Month,Day,Year SignedName of QualifiedElector PrintedName of QualifiedElector Residential Addressor Complete RuralRoute or GeneralDelivery Address City,State,Zip Code 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
The number of signature lines on each page of a printed petition may vary if necessary to accommodate other required textual matter. In this section for referral petitions “full text of the measure” means the bill as passed by the legislative assembly excluding the session and sponsor identification. In this section for initiative petitions “full text of the measure” means an enacting clause which must be: “BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NORTH DAKOTA” and the body of the bill. If the measure amends the law, all new statutory material must be underscored and all statutory material to be deleted must be overstruck by dashes. When repealing portions of the law, the measure must contain a repealer clause and, in brackets, the text of the law being repealed.

Click to view

State of North Dakota County of (county where signed) ss. I, being sworn, say that I am a qualified elector; that I reside at (circulator’s name)
(address) that each signature contained on the attached petition was executed in my presence; and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each individual whose signature appears on the attached petition is a qualified elector; and that each signature contained on the attached petition is the genuine signature of the individual whose name it purports to be. (signature of circulator) Subscribed and sworn to before me on, North Dakota. , at (city) (Notary Seal) (signature of notary) Notary Public My commission expires:

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 1983, ch. 238, § 1; 1985, ch. 233, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 39; 1987, ch. 243, § 1; 1989, ch. 250, § 1; 1991, ch. 206, §§ 1, 6; 1991, ch. 207, § 1; 1997, ch. 52, § 2; 1997, ch. 188, § 1; 1999, ch. 51, § 7; 2001, ch. 200, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, § 2; 2007, ch. 186, § 4; 2009, ch. 65, § 3; 2009, ch. 180, § 3; 2013, ch. 165, § 1; 2013, ch. 164, § 1; 2021, ch. 164, § 11, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-01-09.1.
Recall petitions — Signature — Form — Circulation.

A request of the secretary of state for approval of a petition to recall an elected official or appointed official of a vacated elected office may be presented over the signatures of the sponsoring committee on individual signature forms that have been notarized. The secretary of state shall prepare a signature form that includes provisions for identification of the recall; the printed name, signature, and address of the committee member; and notarization of the signature. The filed signature forms must be originals. The secretary of state shall complete the review of the form of a recall petition in not less than five, nor more than seven, business days, excluding Saturdays.

An individual may not sign a recall petition circulated pursuant to article III of the Constitution of North Dakota or section 44-08-21 unless the individual is a qualified elector. An individual may not sign a petition more than once, and each signer shall also legibly print the signer’s name, complete residential, rural route, or general delivery address, and the date of signing on the petition. Every qualified elector signing a petition must do so in the presence of the individual circulating the petition. A petition must be in substantially the following form:

Each copy of a petition provided for in this section, before being filed, must have attached an affidavit executed by the circulator in substantially the following form:

A petition for recall must include, before the signature lines for the qualified electors as provided in subsection 2, the name of the individual being recalled, the office from which that individual is being recalled, and a list of the names and addresses of not less than five qualified electors of the state, political subdivision, or district in which the official is to be recalled who are sponsoring the recall.

For the recall of an elected official under article III of the Constitution of North Dakota, circulators have one year to gather the required number of signatures of qualified electors on the recall petition from the date the secretary of state approves the recall petition for circulation. For the recall of an elected official under section 44-08-21, circulators have ninety days from the date the secretary of state approves the recall petition for circulation to submit the recall petition to the appropriate filing officer.

A petition may not be circulated under the authority of article III of the Constitution of North Dakota or section 44-08-21 by an individual who is less than eighteen years of age, nor may the affidavit called for by subsection 3 be executed by an individual who is less than eighteen years of age at the time of signing. All petitions circulated under the authority of the constitution and of this section must be circulated in their entirety.

When recall petitions are delivered to the secretary of state or other filing officer with whom a petition for nomination to the office in question is filed, the chairman of the sponsoring committee shall submit to the secretary of state or other filing officer an affidavit stating that to the best of that individual’s knowledge, the petitions contain at least the required number of signatures. The chairperson also shall submit a complete list of petition circulators which must include each circulator’s full name and residential address. The residential address must be in this state and identify the circulator’s street address, city, and zip code. Upon submission of the petitions to the appropriate filing officer, the petitions are considered filed and may not be returned to the chairman of the sponsoring committee for the purpose of continuing the circulation process or resubmitting the petitions at a later time. An elector’s name may not be removed by the elector from a recall petition that has been submitted to and received by the appropriate filing officer.

The filing officer has a reasonable period, not to exceed thirty days, in which to pass upon the sufficiency of a recall petition. The filing officer may conduct a representative random sampling of the signatures contained in the petitions by the use of questionnaires, postcards, telephone calls, personal interviews, or other accepted information-gathering techniques, or any combinations thereof, to determine the validity of the signatures. Signatures determined by the filing officer to be invalid may not be counted and all violations of law discovered by the filing officer must be reported to the state’s attorney for possible prosecution.

The filing officer shall call a special recall election to be held no sooner than ninety-five days nor later than one hundred five days following the date the filing officer certifies the petition valid and sufficient. No special recall election may be called if that date would be within ninety-five days of the next scheduled election.

A notice of the recall election must be posted in the official newspaper thirty days before the candidate filing deadline, which is by four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the election. The official notice must include the necessary information for a candidate to file and have the candidate’s name included on the ballot.

An official may not be recalled if the recall special election would occur within one year of the next regularly scheduled election in which the official could be re-elected.

RECALL PETITION We, the undersigned, being qualified electors request that the be recalled for the reason or reasons of . (name of the individual being recalled) (office of individual being recalled) RECALL SPONSORING COMMITTEE The following are the names and addresses of the qualified electors of the state of North Dakota and the political subdivision who, as the sponsoring committee for the petitioners, represent and act for the petitioners in accordance with law: Complete Residential, Rural Route, or General Name Delivery Address 1. (Chairperson) 2. 3. 4. 5. INSTRUCTIONS TO PETITION SIGNERS You are being asked to sign a petition. You must be a qualified elector. This means you are eighteen years old, you have lived in North Dakota for thirty days, and you are a United States citizen. All signers shall also legibly print their name, complete residential, rural route, or general delivery address, and date of signing on the petition. Every qualified elector signing a petition must do so in the presence of the individual circulating the petition. QUALIFIED ELECTOR Month, Signed Printed Complete Residential, Day, Name of Name of Rural Route, City Year Qualified Qualified or General State, Elector Elector Delivery Address Zip Code 1. (Chairperson) 2. 3. 4. 5. 6. 7. 8. The number of signature lines on each page of a printed petition may vary if necessary to accommodate other required textual matter.

Click to view

State of North Dakota County of (county where signed) ss. I, being sworn, say that I am a qualified elector; that I reside at (circulator’s name)
(address) that each signature contained on the attached petition was executed in my presence; and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each individual whose signature appears on the attached petition is a qualified elector; and that each signature contained on the attached petition is the genuine signature of the individual whose name it purports to be. (signature of circulator) Subscribed and sworn to before me on ,North Dakota. , at (city) (Notary Seal) (signature of notary) Notary Public My commission expires:

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 201, § 1; 2005, ch. 185, § 2; 2009, ch. 180; § 4; 2013, ch. 164, § 2; 2013, ch. 165, § 2; 2013, ch. 176, § 3; 2015, ch. 158, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 172, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 164, § 12, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 158, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 16.1-01-09.1 was amended 3 times by 2013 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 2 of chapter 164, Session Laws 2013, House Bill 1402; section 2 of chapter 165, Session Law 2013, House Bill 1372; and section 3 of chapter 176, Session Law 2013, Senate Bill 2374.

16.1-01-10.
Secretary of state to pass upon sufficiency of petitions — Method — Time limit.

The secretary of state shall have a reasonable period, not to exceed thirty-five days, in which to pass upon the sufficiency of any petition mentioned in section 16.1-01-09. The secretary of state shall conduct a representative random sampling of the signatures contained in the petitions by the use of questionnaires, postcards, telephone calls, personal interviews, or other accepted information-gathering techniques, or any combinations thereof, to determine the validity of the signatures. Signatures determined by the secretary of state to be invalid may not be counted and all violations of law discovered by the secretary of state must be reported to the attorney general for prosecution.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 1991, ch. 208, § 1; 1995, ch. 206, § 2.